Illinois, session 104th, SB822.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Compensation Review Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (25 ILCS 120/1)  (from Ch. 63, par. 901)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8"Compensation Review Act". 9(Source: P.A. 83-1177.)